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LAND CRUISER (W/G) (RM616E)

DTC C 1244 / 44 Deceleration Sensor Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
This sensor detects deceleration on the vehicle. The sensor signal is used in ABS control. If the sensor func-
tions abnormally, the ABS warning light comes on.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

C1244/44

Either of the following (1), (2), (3) or (4) is detected:
(1)Thecondition thatECUterminalsGL1valuesare −1.5Gor

less or 1.5 G or more continues for 1.2 secs. or more.
(2)Thecondition that thedecelerationsensor terminalVGS

voltage is4.4Vor lessor5.6Vormorecontinues for
1.2 secs. or more.

(4) Deceleration sensor signal momentary open occurs for
7 times or more.

SDecelerationsensor
SDecelerationsensorcircuit

Fail safe function:
If trouble occurs in the deceleration sensor circuit, the ECU cuts off current to the ABS solenoid relay and
prohibits ABS control and the brake system becomes normal.
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between deceleration
sensor and ABS ECU (See page IN−24).

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

2 Check deceleration sensor (See page DI−312) .

NG Replace deceleration sensor.

OK

Check and replace ABS ECU.


